Maryland, session 2026, HB1298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
SUBTITLE 13. THIRD–PARTY LITIGATION FINANCING.
12–1301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1298*

HOUSE BILL 1298
(B) “CIVIL ACTION” INCLUDES ANY LEGAL CLAIM, CASE, ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEEDING, OR PORTFOLIO OF ACTIONS TO RECOVER DAMAGES IN THE STATE.
(C) “CONSUMER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS DOMICILED, RESIDES, OR
IS PRESENT IN THE STATE, OR WHO IS OR MAY BECOME A PLAINTIFF, A CLAIMANT,
OR A COMPLAINANT IN A CIVIL ACTION IN THE STATE.
(D) “LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE” MEANS AN ATTORNEY, A GROUP OF
ATTORNEYS, OR A LAW FIRM LICENSED AND AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE LAW AND
REPRESENT A CONSUMER IN A CIVIL ACTION IN THE STATE.
(E) “LITIGATION FINANCIER” MEANS A PERSON OR A GROUP OF PERSONS
ENGAGED IN OR FORMED, CREATED, OR ESTABLISHED FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ENGAGING IN THE BUSINESS OF LITIGATION FINANCING OR ANY OTHER BUSINESS
OR ECONOMIC ACTIVITY IN WHICH A PERSON OR A GROUP OF PERSONS RECEIVES
CONSIDERATION OF ANY KIND IN EXCHANGE FOR PROVIDING LITIGATION
FINANCING.
(F) “LITIGATION FINANCING” MEANS THE FINANCING, FUNDING,
ADVANCING, OR LOANING OF MONEY TO A CONSUMER IF:
(1) THE REPAYMENT OF ALL OR ANY PORTION OF THE AMOUNT
FINANCED, FUNDED, ADVANCED, OR LOANED IS:
(I) CONTINGENT ON THE OUTCOME OF A CIVIL ACTION; OR
(II) REQUIRED ONLY IF THE CONSUMER PREVAILS IN A CIVIL
ACTION; OR
(2) THE MONEY OR FUNDS FOR THE REPAYMENT OF ANY AMOUNT OF
FINANCING, FUNDING, ADVANCE, OR LOAN IS DERIVED OR SOURCED, DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY, FROM THE PROCEEDS OR OTHER CONSIDERATION REALIZED FROM
ANY JUDGMENT, AWARD, SETTLEMENT, VERDICT, OR OTHER FORM OF MONETARY
RELIEF THE CONSUMER MAY RECEIVE OR RECOVER IN RELATION TO A CIVIL
ACTION.
(G) (1) “LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT” MEANS A WRITTEN
CONTRACT IN WHICH A LITIGATION FINANCIER AGREES TO PROVIDE LITIGATION
FINANCING TO A CONSUMER IN CONJUNCTION WITH A CIVIL ACTION AS
CONSIDERATION FOR:
(I) REPAYMENT OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING;

HOUSE BILL 1298 3
(II) THE PAYMENT OF INTEREST, FEES, OR OTHER
CONSIDERATION TO THE LITIGATION FINANCIER; OR
(III) ASSIGNING TO THE LITIGATION FINANCIER A RIGHT TO
RECEIVE PAYMENT FROM THE VALUE OF:
1. ANY PROCEEDS OR OTHER CONSIDERATION
REALIZED FROM ANY JUDGMENT, AWARD, SETTLEMENT, OR VERDICT; OR
2. ANY OTHER FORM OF MONETARY RELIEF A
CONSUMER, A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE, OR ANY OTHER PERSON MAY RECEIVE OR
RECOVER IN RELATION TO THE CIVIL ACTION.
(2) “LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
AGREEMENT, A CONTRACT, OR AN ENGAGEMENT OF A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE TO
RENDER LEGAL SERVICES TO A CONSUMER ON A CONTINGENCY FEE BASIS,
INCLUDING THE ADVANCEMENT OF LEGAL COSTS BY THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE
IN WHICH THE SERVICES OR COSTS ARE PROVIDED TO OR ON BEHALF OF A
CONSUMER BY THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE WHO IS REPRESENTING THE
CONSUMER IN A CIVIL ACTION.
(H) “PORTFOLIO OF ACTIONS” MEANS AN ARRANGEMENT IN WHICH A
LITIGATION FINANCIER FINANCES MULTIPLE CIVIL ACTIONS BELONGING TO AN
ATTORNEY OR A LAW FIRM WITH ANY RETURN ON INVESTED CAPITAL COMING FROM
THE SETTLEMENT OR JUDGMENT OF ANY INDIVIDUAL CIVIL ACTION OR GROUP OF
CIVIL ACTIONS.
12–1302.
IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO PROMOTE CONSUMER
PROTECTION AND TRANSPARENCY IN THIRD–PARTY LITIGATION FINANCING
TRANSACTIONS THROUGH THE LICENSING, REGULATION, AND DISCLOSURE
REQUIREMENTS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1303.
(A) A LITIGATION FINANCIER MAY NOT PROVIDE LITIGATION FINANCING
UNLESS THE LITIGATION FINANCIER IS LICENSED UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 2 OR
3 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) LITIGATION FINANCING SHALL BE CONSIDERED A LOAN SUBJECT TO
TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 1, 3, 9, OR 10 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE AS MAY BE
APPLICABLE.

HOUSE BILL 1298
12–1304.
(A) A PARTY IN A CIVIL ACTION SHALL PROVIDE, WITHOUT WAITING FOR A
DISCOVERY REQUEST, TO EACH OF THE OTHER PARTIES IN THE CIVIL ACTION AND
EACH INSURER THAT HAS A DUTY TO DEFEND ANOTHER PARTY IN THE CIVIL ACTION
ANY LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT UNDER WHICH A LITIGATION FINANCIER
HAS A RIGHT TO RECEIVE COMPENSATION THAT IS CONTINGENT IN ANY RESPECT ON
THE OUTCOME OF THE CIVIL ACTION.
(B) DISCLOSURE IS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER A CIVIL ACTION HAS FORMALLY COMMENCED.
(C) (1) THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IS A CONTINUING OBLIGATION.
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER ENTERING INTO A LITIGATION FINANCING
CONTRACT OR AMENDING AN EXISTING LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT, A PARTY
IN A CIVIL ACTION SHALL DISCLOSE AND DELIVER A NEW OR AMENDED LITIGATION
FINANCING CONTRACT TO ALL OTHER PARTIES AND EACH INSURER THAT HAS A
DUTY TO DEFEND ANOTHER PARTY IN THE CIVIL ACTION.
12–1305.
THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION ARE PERMISSIBLE SUBJECTS OF DISCOVERY
IN ANY CIVIL ACTION FOR WHICH LITIGATION FINANCING IS PROVIDED UNDER A
LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER A CIVIL ACTION HAS
FORMALLY COMMENCED:
(1) THE EXISTENCE OF A LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT;
(2) EACH PARTICIPANT OR PARTY TO THE LITIGATION FINANCING
CONTRACT; AND
(3) THE CONTENTS OF THE LITIGATION FINANCING CONTRACT.
12–1306.
THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other

HOUSE BILL 1298 5
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except for § 12–1303 of the
Financial Institutions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, this Act shall be construed
to apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any litigation financing contract, as defined in § 12–1301 of the Financial
Institutions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, entered into before the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.